root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
flag *Z:
   [AEIOUYžščřJ]A    > -A,I
   [^SRN]CA    > -A,I
   [SRN]CA    > -CA,KY
   ďA    > -ďA,DI
   ňA    > -ňA,NI
   ťA    > -ťA,TI
   [^AEIOUYžščřCJďťň]A    > -A,Y
   [BDFMNPTVW]A    > -A,ě
   ďA    > -ďA,Dě
   ňA    > -ňA,Ně
   ťA    > -ťA,Tě
   GA    > -GA,ZE
   CHA    > -CHA,šE
   [^C]HA    > -HA,ZE
   KA    > -KA,CE
   [^R]RA    > -RA,řE
   RRA    > -RRA,řE
   [^BDFMNPTVWďťňGHKR]A    > -A,E
   A    > -A,U
   A    > -A,O
   A    > -A,OU
   EA    > -A,Y
   [AEIOUY]A    > -A,í
   A    > -A,áM
   A    > -A,áCH
   A    > MI
   [^A]Y    > -Y,áM
   [^A]Y    > -Y,áCH
   [^A]Y    > -Y,AMI
   AY    > E
   AY    > I
   AY    > í
   AY    > íM
   AY    > íCH
   AY    > EMI
   S    > -S,DA
   S    > -S,DY
   S    > -S,Dě
   S    > -S,DU
   S    > -S,DO
   S    > -S,DOU
   S    > -S,DáM
   S    > -S,DáCH
   S    > -S,DAMI
   [^G]E    > -E,I
   [^G]E    > -E,í
   [^G]E    > -E,íM
   [^G]E    > -E,íCH
   [^G]E    > MI
   ě    > -ě,I
   ě    > -ě,í
   ě    > -ě,íM
   ě    > -ě,íCH
   ě    > MI
   DGE    > -GE,žI
   DGE    > -GE,ží
   DGE    > -GE,žíM
   DGE    > -GE,žíCH
   DGE    > -GE,žEMI
   [^AEIOYě]SEň    > -Eň,Ně
   [^AEIOYě]SEň    > -Eň,NI
   [^AEIOYě]SEň    > -Eň,Ní
   [^AEIOYě]SEň    > -Eň,NíM
   [^AEIOYě]SEň    > -Eň,NíCH
   [^AEIOYě]SEň    > -Eň,NěMI
   [AEIOYě]SEň    > -ň,Ně
   [AEIOYě]SEň    > -ň,NI
   [AEIOYě]SEň    > -ň,Ní
   [AEIOYě]SEň    > -ň,NíM
   [AEIOYě]SEň    > -ň,NíCH
   [AEIOYě]SEň    > -ň,NěMI
   [^LřS]Eň    > -Eň,Ně
   [^LřS]Eň    > -Eň,NI
   [^LřS]Eň    > -Eň,Ní
   [^LřS]Eň    > -Eň,NíM
   [^LřS]Eň    > -Eň,NíCH
   [^LřS]Eň    > -Eň,NěMI
   [Lř]Eň    > -ň,Ně
   [Lř]Eň    > -ň,NI
   [Lř]Eň    > -ň,Ní
   [Lř]Eň    > -ň,NíM
   [Lř]Eň    > -ň,NíCH
   [Lř]Eň    > -ň,NěMI
   EV    > -EV,VE
   EV    > -EV,VI
   EV    > -EV,Ví
   EV    > -EV,VíM
   EV    > -EV,VíCH
   EV    > -EV,VEMI
   [^LP]EC    > -EC,CE
   [^LP]EC    > -EC,CI
   [^LP]EC    > -EC,Cí
   [^LP]EC    > -EC,CíM
   [^LP]EC    > -EC,CíCH
   [^LP]EC    > -EC,CEMI
   [LP]EC    > E
   [LP]EC    > I
   [LP]EC    > í
   [LP]EC    > íM
   [LP]EC    > íCH
   [LP]EC    > EMI
   [JLPTXZčšřž]    > E
   [JLMPTXZčšřž]    > I
   [JLMPTXZčšřž]    > í
   [JLMPTXZčšřž]    > íM
   [JLMPTXZčšřž]    > íCH
   [JLMPTXZčšřž]    > EMI
   EM    > ě
   EM    > ěMI
   [^E][CMV]    > E
   [^E][CV]    > I
   [^E][CV]    > í
   [^E][CV]    > íM
   [^E][CV]    > íCH
   [^E][CV]    > EMI
   [^E]ň    > -ň,Ně
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NI
   [^E]ň    > -ň,Ní
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NíM
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NíCH
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NěMI
   ť    > -ť,Tě
   ť    > -ť,TI
   ť    > -ť,Tí
   ť    > -ť,TíM
   ť    > -ť,TíCH
   ť    > -ť,TěMI
   ď    > -ď,Dě
   ď    > -ď,DI
   ď    > -ď,Dí
   ď    > -ď,DíM
   ď    > -ď,DíCH
   ď    > -ď,DěMI

flag *C:
   ICE    > -CE,C
   [^I]CE    > -E,í
   [čIJLř]E    > -E,í
   šE    > -E,
   [CčIJLřš]E    > -E,íM
   [CčIJLřš]E    > -E,íCH
   [CčIJLš]E    > MI
   řE    > -E,MI
   ě    > -ě,í
   ě    > -ě,íM
   ě    > -ě,íCH
   ě    > MI
   í    > M
   O    > -O,A
   O    > -O,U
   O    > -O,EM
   CKý    > -CKý,čNOST
   CKý    > -CKý,čNOSTI
   CKý    > -CKý,čNOSTí
   CKý    > -CKý,čNOSTEM
   CKý    > -CKý,čNOSTECH
   CKý    > -CKý,čNOSTMI
   OCI    > -CI,žEN
   OCI    > -CI,žENA
   OCI    > -CI,žENO
   OCI    > -CI,žENI
   OCI    > -CI,žENY
   OCI    > -CI,žENU
   [^S]TIT    > -TIT,CEN
   [^S]TIT    > -TIT,CENA
   [^S]TIT    > -TIT,CENO
   [^S]TIT    > -TIT,CENI
   [^S]TIT    > -TIT,CENY
   [^S]TIT    > -TIT,CENU
   [^Zž]DIT    > -DIT,ZEN
   [^Zž]DIT    > -DIT,ZENA
   [^Zž]DIT    > -DIT,ZENO
   [^Zž]DIT    > -DIT,ZENI
   [^Zž]DIT    > -DIT,ZENY
   [^Zž]DIT    > -DIT,ZENU
   SIT    > -SIT,šEN
   SIT    > -SIT,šENA
   SIT    > -SIT,šENO
   SIT    > -SIT,šENI
   SIT    > -SIT,šENY
   SIT    > -SIT,šENU
   ZIT    > -ZIT,žEN
   ZIT    > -ZIT,žENA
   ZIT    > -ZIT,žENO
   ZIT    > -ZIT,žENI
   ZIT    > -ZIT,žENY
   ZIT    > -ZIT,žENU
   SLIT    > -SLIT,šLEN
   SLIT    > -SLIT,šLENA
   SLIT    > -SLIT,šLENO
   SLIT    > -SLIT,šLENI
   SLIT    > -SLIT,šLENY
   SLIT    > -SLIT,šLENU
   STIT    > -STIT,šTěN
   STIT    > -STIT,šTěNA
   STIT    > -STIT,šTěNO
   STIT    > -STIT,šTěNI
   STIT    > -STIT,šTěNY
   STIT    > -STIT,šTěNU
   ZDIT    > -ZDIT,žDěN
   ZDIT    > -ZDIT,žDěNA
   ZDIT    > -ZDIT,žDěNO
   ZDIT    > -ZDIT,žDěNI
   ZDIT    > -ZDIT,žDěNY
   ZDIT    > -ZDIT,žDěNU
   áHNOUT    > -áHNOUT,AžEN
   áHNOUT    > -áHNOUT,AžENA
   áHNOUT    > -áHNOUT,AžENO
   áHNOUT    > -áHNOUT,AžENI
   áHNOUT    > -áHNOUT,AžENY
   áHNOUT    > -áHNOUT,AžENU
   CHNOUT    > -CHNOUT,šEN
   CHNOUT    > -CHNOUT,šENA
   CHNOUT    > -CHNOUT,šENO
   CHNOUT    > -CHNOUT,šENI
   CHNOUT    > -CHNOUT,šENY
   CHNOUT    > -CHNOUT,šENU
   [^áC]HNOUT    > -HNOUT,žEN
   [^áC]HNOUT    > -HNOUT,žENA
   [^áC]HNOUT    > -HNOUT,žENO
   [^áC]HNOUT    > -HNOUT,žENI
   [^áC]HNOUT    > -HNOUT,žENY
   [^áC]HNOUT    > -HNOUT,žENU
   éKNOUT    > -éKNOUT,EčEN
   éKNOUT    > -éKNOUT,EčENA
   éKNOUT    > -éKNOUT,EčENO
   éKNOUT    > -éKNOUT,EčENI
   éKNOUT    > -éKNOUT,EčENY
   éKNOUT    > -éKNOUT,EčENU
   SKNOUT    > -SKNOUT,šTěN
   SKNOUT    > -SKNOUT,šTěNA
   SKNOUT    > -SKNOUT,šTěNO
   SKNOUT    > -SKNOUT,šTěNI
   SKNOUT    > -SKNOUT,šTěNY
   SKNOUT    > -SKNOUT,šTěNU
   [^éS]KNOUT    > -KNOUT,čEN
   [^éS]KNOUT    > -KNOUT,čENA
   [^éS]KNOUT    > -KNOUT,čENO
   [^éS]KNOUT    > -KNOUT,čENI
   [^éS]KNOUT    > -KNOUT,čENY
   [^éS]KNOUT    > -KNOUT,čENU

flag *M:
   [^C]O    > -O,A
   [^C]O    > -O,U
   DLO    > -O,E
   [^C]O    > -O,EM
   [^CIY]O    > -O,ůM
   [^CGHKEIY]O    > -O,ECH
   [GHK]O    > -O,áCH
   ISKO    > -KO,CíCH
   [^žščřCJIY]O    > -O,Y
   [AEIOUY]O    > -O,í
   [EIY]O    > -O,íM
   [EIY]O    > -O,íCH
   [žščřJEIY]O    > -O,I
   A    > -A,ůM
   [GHK]A    > -A,áCH
   [^GHKEI]A    > -O,ECH
   [^žščřCJI]A    > -A,Y
   ON    > -ON,A
   ON    > -ON,U
   ON    > -ON,EM
   ON    > -ON,í
   ON    > -ON,íM
   ON    > -ON,íCH
   ON    > -ON,I
   UM    > -UM,A
   UM    > -UM,U
   UM    > -UM,EM
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]UM    > -UM,í
   [AEIOUYáéíóúůýě]UM    > -UM,íM
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúůýě]UM    > -UM,ůM
   [AEIOUYáéíóúůýě]UM    > -UM,íCH
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúůýěK]UM    > -UM,ECH
   KUM    > -UM,áCH
   [^HKRDTNBFLMBSVZ]UM    > -UM,I
   [HKRDTNBFLMBSVZ]UM    > -UM,Y
   [^SRN]CO    > -O,A
   [SRN]CO    > -CO,KA
   [SRN]CO    > -CO,KU
   [SRN]CO    > -CO,KEM
   [SRN]CO    > -CO,KůM
   [SRN]CO    > -CO,KY
   [SRN]CO    > -O,íCH
   E    > -E,I
   [Eě]    > M
   E    > -E,í
   E    > -E,íM
   E    > -E,íCH
   ě    > -ě,I
   Tě    > -Tě,ť
   Mě    > -ě,í
   ě    > -ě,íM
   ě    > -ě,íCH
