root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
áčko/MQ
adorace/Z
agnesiánka/ZQ
aktinium/MQ
aktualistický/YCR
aktualita/ZQ
alkoholýza/ZQ
alopatický/YCRN
aluminium/MQ
aminolýza/ZQ
anarchosyndikalistický/YCR
andulka/ZQ
anotace/Z
anthelmintikum/MQ
antiesencialistický/YCR
antihistaminikum/MQ
antiseptikum/MQ
antitetický/YCRN
antropotechnika/ZQ
apretování/SM
archeologie/Z
Arnoltice/C
Asijka/ZQ
Ašsko/C
atopie/Z
augmentativum/MQ
autohavárie/Z
automatický/YCRN
avesta/ZQ
aviso/MQ
bahnisko/MQ
bajka/ZQ
barborka/ZQ
Baskicko/MQ
bažinka/ZQ
behavioralistický/YCR
Benecko/MQ
benzylpyridinia/ZQ
Bezdědice/C
biblistika/ZQ
bičiště/M
bioenergetický/YCRN
biohnojivo/MQ
biometeorologie/Z
bláto/MQR
bleška/ZQ
Bodamsko/C
bojiště/M
Boletice/C
bonboniéra/ZQ
brambořiště/M
Braniborsko/C
brašnička/ZQ
bronchopneumonický/YCR
brouzdaliště/M
brusinka/ZQ
bříško/MQ
budit/ACN
bundička/ZQ
bydliště/M
cellistka/ZQ
celniště/M
centristický/YCRN
cikorka/ZQ
cinkátko/MQ
cukrovkářka/ZQ
cvičiště/M
čadit/ACN
Čečna/ZQ
Černíkovice/C
čeřidlo/MQ
Čimelice/C
čiplenka/ZQ
číslo/MQR
čtyřicetiminutovka/ZQ
Dasnice/C
Dáša/ZQ
dávidlo/MQ
degustátorka/ZQ
delfinárium/MQ
Delvita/ZQ
Děpoltice/C
deponie/Z
depositum/MQ
determinace/Z
děvčátko/MQ
diakonie/Z
dírečka/ZQ
disharmonický/YCR
diskontinuum/MQ
divizna/ZQ
Dlouhopolsko/MQ
Dobšice/C
dohledno/MQN
doktorandka/ZQ
dokvasit/ACN
dopustit/ACN
dotvrdit/ACN
dovolenka/ZQ
drastický/YCRN
dráždidlo/MQ
drobnůstka/ZQ
dříví/C
dřívko/MQ
dubióza/ZQ
dusadlo/MQ
dvojkolo/MQR
dvojpostel/Z
dýnko/MQ
džinistka/ZQ
ekliptický/YCRN
ekocentrum/MQ
električka/ZQ
embéčko/MQ
Emílie/Z
energický/YCR
erko/MQ
esoterický/YCR
esperanto/MQ
etnografka/ZQ
euroskepticistický/YCR
evengelium/MQ
extremistka/ZQ
fantasmagorický/YCRN
fidlátko/MQ
fiflena/ZQ
folkloristický/YCR
fotobuňka/ZQ
foukadlo/MQ
funkcionalistický/YCR
fyziatrie/Z
gálium/MQ
genocentrický/YCR
gestapačka/ZQ
ghetto/MQ
gorický/YCRN
guano/MQ
Habrůvka/ZQ
harampádí/C
harmonium/MQ
hektický/YCRN
Hermína/ZQ
Heřmánkovice/C
heslo/MQR
hliniště/M
Hlušice/C
hnojivo/MQ
Holešovice/C
holoseč/Z
Horčápsko/MQ
hostit/ACN
hovado/MQ
hradisko/MQ
hradit/ACN
hrotovačka/ZQ
Hřensko/MQ
Huštěnovice/C
hyperonymum/MQ
hypersonický/YCR
hypertechnika/ZQ
chimérický/YCRN
chladivo/MQ
chránítko/MQ
chromosféra/ZQ
Chroustovice/C
idylický/YCRN
imago/MQ
indianistka/ZQ
infimum/MQ
interolerabilita/ZQ
ischiadický/YCRN
jablíčko/MQ
Jakarta/ZQ
Janovice/C
jaro/MQR
jezírko/MQ
Jičínsko/C
jircha/ZQ
Jutsko/C
kafíčko/MQ
kalanetika/ZQ
kapátko/MQ
kapusta/ZQ
Karlovarsko/C
kavalírka/ZQ
kejkle/C
kladivo/MQ
klikatit/ACN
klisna/ZQ
kluzadlo/MQ
kolna/ZQ
Koloděje/C
kolokvium/MQ
Konganka/ZQ
Konopiště/M
konzumistický/YCR
kopretina/ZQ
koryto/MQR
Kovoslužba/ZQ
Kožušice/C
Kravsko/MQ
kreacionistický/YCR
Kropáčova/ZQ
krystalinikum/MQ
Křenice/C
Kuchařovice/C
kultistka/ZQ
kuratorium/MQ
kvasnice/C
kytaristka/ZQ
kyvadélko/MQ
lebedka/ZQ
lego/MQ
lehnický/YCRN
letectvo/MQ
ležácký/YCRN
Libkova/ZQ
lidstvo/C
Lipo/MQ
Livonsko/C
loďka/ZQ
Lověšice/C
lůno/MQR
lvice/ZQ
magický/YCRN
Málkovice/C
maloburžoasie/Z
mango/MQ
Marseille/C
Maryša/ZQ
médium/MQ
mechanický/YCRN
mechovnatka/ZQ
Měrovice/C
metafyzično/MQ
mezopický/YCRN
míchanice/ZQ
mimoliturgický/YCR
minijeviště/M
mise/Z
Mlečice/C
močáliště/M
monogenetický/YCR
monoteistka/ZQ
Mostecko/C
mraveniště/M
multiperspektivita/ZQ
mýtit/ACN
nádobíčko/MQ
nadtrhnout/ACN
náhoda/ZQ
namastit/ACN
narodit/ACN
nasnídáníčko/MQ
naturistický/YCR
návěj/Z
Nechranice/C
nemluvňátko/MQ
Neprobylice/C
neurověda/ZQ
Nezdice/C
nosítka/MQ
notorický/YCR
novokřtěnka/ZQ
občanstvo/C
obrazit/ACXN
obsílka/ZQ
odbytiště/M
odemknout/ACTN
odrazit/ACXN
Ohařice/C
ohlávka/ZQ
ohřívadlo/MQ
Oldřichovice/C
opěradlo/MQ
operátorka/ZQ
oplodit/ACN
orografický/YCRN
osidlo/MQ
osmiletka/ZQ
ostří/C
pacifistický/YCR
pachatelka/ZQ
palatum/MQ
paradigmatický/YCRN
parašutistka/ZQ
pasívum/MQ
pauperistický/YCR
Pavla/ZQ
perfektivum/MQ
perníkárna/ZQ
peří/C
pilulka/ZQ
pisátko/MQ
plato/MQ
plena/ZQ
plodit/ACN
plusquamperfektum/MQ
podhodnotit/ACN
podnož/Z
podsadit/ACN
Pohořelice/C
pojivo/MQ
polarizace/Z
polofašistický/YCR
pomastit/ACN
popeliště/M
popudit/ACN
porculánka/ZQ
potvrdit/ACN
poutko/MQ
pozounistka/ZQ
pravidlo/MQ
premorfologický/YCR
Prievidza/ZQ
prkýnko/MQ
prosit/ACN
prostopášnice/ZQ
provizorium/MQ
Přáslavice/C
přástky/ZQ
představenstvo/MQ
přechodit/ACN
přeudit/ACN
přidavačka/ZQ
přisladit/ACN
pseudopódium/MQ
ptáčnice/ZQ
pyrrhonistický/YCR
Radka/ZQ
rádlo/MQ
razidlo/MQ
rdousit/ACN
reforma/ZQ
reprodukce/Z
rizoto/MQ
Rokytna/ZQ
rozběžiště/M
rozhostit/ACN
rozvodna/ZQ
Rumunsko/C
rydélko/MQ
řečičky/ZQ
řidítka/MQ
sáňkařka/ZQ
sarajevo/MQ
scenáristický/YCRN
sedminka/ZQ
semimikroměřítko/MQ
seznamka/ZQ
silicium/M
sjednotit/ACN
skladka/ZQ
skrutinium/M
slota/ZQ
sluchátko/MQ
Smržice/C
Sobotiště/M
sojka/ZQ
splácanina/ZQ
splachovadlo/MQ
spoluvlastnický/YCRN
starousedlice/ZQ
startoviště/M
storno/MQ
Strakonice/C
stravovna/ZQ
střihadlo/MQ
subskripce/Z
súfistický/YCR
supremum/MQ
svída/ZQ
symbiotický/YCR
šatnička/ZQ
šidélko/MQ
Šilheřovice/C
šlechtična/ZQ
štěstíčko/MQ
štukatérka/ZQ
Tatrovice/C
tektonika/ZQ
tělísko/MQ
těstíčko/MQ
theologie/Z
tlumítko/MQ
torický/YCRN
torzo/MQ
toxoplasmosa/ZQ
trivium/MQ
trocha/ZQ
Třebovice/C
tůňka/ZQ
tvrdidlo/MQ
uhlí/C
ukazovátko/MQ
úlitba/ZQ
upustit/ACN
Úvalno/MQ
uzenina/ZQ
Valašsko/C
vědérko/MQ
vegetace/Z
Veselíčko/MQ
věznice/ZQ
vidle/C
vitiligo/MQ
vladařka/ZQ
Votice/C
vótum/MQ
vrba/ZQ
vřetýnko/MQ
vyhladit/ACN
vypalovačka/ZQ
vyřadit/ACTN
vyzvrátit/ACN
vzpěrka/ZQ
ytterbium/MQ
zakvasit/ACN
zásada/ZQ
zatáhnout/ACN
závažíčko/MQ
zemnice/ZQ
zhasínátko/MQ
zhustit/ACN
zpozdit/ACN
zrníčko/MQ
ztuchlina/ZQ
Želívsko/MQ
Žeranovice/C
živnostnice/ZQ
